Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB477.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of June 29, 1953 (P.L.304, No.66), known as the Vital Statistics Law of 1953, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 404. Birth Registration: Certain Information Prohibited.--(a) No certificate of birth filed under this act after the effective date of this subsection may identify the child's sex.(b) The prohibition under subsection (a) shall not apply to 123456789101112131415161718192021222324 any form or data related to a child's birth that is submitted or compiled pursuant to Federal law or regulation.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0477PN0435 - 2 - 123